Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 30 Drugs and Poisons Generally

21-30-1.
Distribution in streets or from house to house prohibited.

No person shall, by himself or herself or by his or her servant or agent, sell, distribute, or give away in any street or highway or from house to house any bottle, box, envelope, or package containing any liquid medicine or any pills, powder, tablets, or other article which contains any drug or poison; provided, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to any person acting as a member, officer, or agent of any pharmaceutical house in the distribution of samples of its products to physicians. Any person, whether acting for himself or herself or for another, or as member, officer, or agent of any partnership or corporation, who shall violate any of the provisions of this section shall be fined not more than fifty dollars ($50.00), or imprisoned not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1913, ch. 938, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 168, §§ 23, 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 274, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1956, §

21-30-1

.

21-30-2.
Prosecution of violations.

It shall be the duty of the department of health to prosecute any person, firm, or corporation violating the provisions of §

21-30-1

, and the director or any other duly authorized agent of the department making a complaint shall not be required to give surety for the payment of costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1913, ch. 938, § 4; P.L. 1916, ch. 1337, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 168, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 274, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; G.L. 1956, §

21-30-2

.

21-30-3.
Labeling of wood alcohol.

Any person who sells, exchanges, or delivers to another person any wood alcohol, sometimes known as methyl alcohol, shall affix to the vessel or container holding the wood alcohol a label bearing the words, “Wood alcohol poison,” printed or written on the vessel or container in letters not less than one-fourth of an inch (1/4") in height, and in addition the words ”it is unlawful to use this fluid in any article of food or drink, or in any medicinal or toilet preparation, intended to be used internally or externally,“ printed or written on the vessel or container in letters not less than one-eighth of an inch (1/8") in height. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 834, § 1; P.L. 1915, ch. 1183, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 168, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 274, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

21-30-3

.

21-30-4.
Sale or possession of wood alcohol with unlawful intent.

Any person who sells, exchanges, or delivers or has in his or her possession with intent to sell, exchange, or deliver any article of food or drink, or any drug, intended for external or internal use, or perfumes or toilet articles, containing any wood alcohol, sometimes known as methyl alcohol, shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00), nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or by both fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 834, § 2; P.L. 1915, ch. 1183, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 168, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 274, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

21-30-4

.

21-30-5.
Prosecution of violations.

It shall be the duty of the department of health to prosecute any person, firm, or corporation violating the provisions of §§

21-30-3

and

21-30-4

, and the director of the department, or any duly authorized agent of the director, may make complaint for the violation of those sections, and the director or agent making the complaint shall not be required to give surety for the payment of costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1183, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 168, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 274, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; G.L. 1956, §

21-30-5

.

21-30-6.
Labeling of poisons — Registration of sales — Prescriptions.

No person shall sell, either by wholesale or retail, any of the poisons enumerated in §

21-30-7

, without distinctly labeling the bottle, box, vessel, or paper and wrapper or cover in which the poison is contained with the name of the article, the word “poison,” and the name and place of business of the seller; and every registered pharmacist selling or dispensing any of these poisons shall first enter in a book, to be kept for that purpose only, and subject always to inspection by the board of pharmacy or any officer or agent of the board or other proper authority, and to be preserved for at least five (5) years, a record of the sale or dispensing; provided, that if any of the poisons form a part of the ingredients of any medicine or medicines compounded in accordance with the written prescription of a medical practitioner, the medicine need not be labeled with the word “poison”; but all prescriptions, whether or not composed in part or in whole of any of these ingredients, shall be carefully kept by the pharmacist on a file or in a book used for that purpose only and numbered in the order in which they are received or dispensed, and every box, bottle, vial, vessel, or packet containing medicines so dispensed shall be labeled with the name and place of business of the registered pharmacist so dispensing the medicine, and be numbered with a number corresponding with that on the original prescription retained by the pharmacist on the book or file. The prescriptions shall be preserved at least five (5) years and shall be open to the inspection of the writer of them, and a copy shall be furnished free of expense whenever demanded by either the writer or the purchaser.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 152, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 178, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 167, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 276, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1948, ch. 2040, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-30-6

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 63.

21-30-7.
Poisons subject to labeling and registration.

The following substances are poisons subject to labeling as provided in §

21-30-6

:

Arsenic and its preparations.

Carbolic acid.

Corrosive sublimate.

Cotton root and its preparations.

Cyanide of potassium.

Ergot and its preparations.

Hydrocyanic acid.

Opium and its preparations, paregoric excepted.

Oxalic acid.

Savin.

Strychnia.

Volatile oil of bitter almonds, of pennyroyal, of savin, and of tansy.

Proprietary or secret medicines recommended, sold or advertised as emmenagogues and parturients.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 152, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 178, § 12; P.L. 1912, ch. 841, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 167, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 276, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

21-30-7

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 63.

21-30-8.
Repealed.

21-30-9.
Adulteration of drugs.

Every person who shall knowingly adulterate, or cause to be mixed with any foreign or inert substance, any drug or medicinal substance, or any compound medicinal preparation recognized by the pharmacopoeia of the United States or of other countries, as employed in medicinal practice, with the effect of weakening or destroying its medicinal power, or who shall sell the adulterated drug knowing it to be adulterated shall, in addition to the penalties prescribed in §§

21-30-1

and

21-31-5

, forfeit to the use of the state all adulterated articles found in that person’s possession and shall be deprived of the right of practicing as a pharmacist in this state after this. Whenever a complaint shall be made of any violation of the provisions of this section, the board of pharmacy, on being notified of it, shall investigate the complaint, employing competent persons when necessary to make analysis of the articles alleged to be adulterated; and if the complaint shall be substantiated, the board shall assist in prosecuting the respondent.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 152, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 178, § 12; P.L. 1912, ch. 841, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 167, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 276, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1948, ch. 2040, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-30-9

.